District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-1813.01

Additions to tax — Delinquencies.

Repealed.

History

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 356, ch. 258, art. I, title XIII, § 1
Mar. 31, 1956, 70 Stat. 79, ch. 154, § 13
Aug. 2, 1968, 82 Stat. 612, Pub. L. 90-450, title II, § 203(b)
1973, Ed., § 47-1589
Oct. 21, 1975, D.C. Law 1-23, title VI, § 607, 22 DCR 2113
Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-158, § 4, 25 DCR 7002
Sept. 13, 1980, D.C. Law 3-92, § 503(a), 27 DCR 3390
July 24, 1982, D.C. Law 4-131, § 108(a), (b), 29 DCR 2418
Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-113, § 302(d), 31 DCR 3974
Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-209, § 404(b), 34 DCR 689
Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-29, § 2(m), 34 DCR 5097
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(dd)(2), 48 DCR 334

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1813.1.

Effective Dates

Section 601(b) of D.C. Law 6-209 provided that title III and sections 401, 402, 404, 405 and 406 of the act shall take effect on October 1, 1987.

Editor's Notes

Mayor authorized to issue rules: See second paragraph of note to § 47-2601.

Section 410(d) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(a), (c), (j), (m), (p), (q), (s), (w), (bb), (dd), (ee), (hh) through (kk), (mm) through (oo), (qq) through (uu), (yy), (zz), (bbb), (ddd), and (fff) shall apply for all tax years or taxable periods beginning after December 31, 2000.”